Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1618
Agricultural products; producers; associations; form; requirements.

Persons engaged in the production of agricultural products as farmers, planters, ranchmen, dairymen, nut growers, or fruit growers may act together in associations, corporate or otherwise, with or without capital stock, in collectively processing, preparing for market, handling, and marketing such products in intrastate commerce. Such associations may have marketing agencies in common, and the associations and their members may make the necessary contracts and agreements to effect such purposes. The associations shall be operated for the mutual benefit of the members thereof, as such producers, and conform to one or both of the following requirements:

(1) That no member of the association is allowed more than one vote because of the amount of stock or membership capital he may own therein; or

(2) That the association does not pay dividends on stock or membership capital in excess of eight percent per annum.

Such association shall not deal in the products of nonmembers to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it for members.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 25.